Maine, session 132, LD869.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4005-D, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Grandparent's right to intervenor status. Upon request, the court may
designate a grandparent as an intervenor. A judge shall base this decision on whether the
department has placed the child in foster care. A grandparent who has been designated as
an intervenor under this subsection has the right to be heard and the right to present or
cross-examine witnesses, present evidence and have access to pleadings and records.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4005-H, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 411, §11, is amended
to read:
1. Grandparent visitation or access. A grandparent who is designated as an
interested person or a participant or who has been granted intervenor status under section
4005‑D or who has been granted intervenor status under the Maine Rules of Civil
Procedure, Rule 24 may request the court to grant reasonable rights of visitation or access.
When a child is placed in a prospective adoptive home and the prospective adoptive parents
have signed an adoptive placement agreement, a grandparent's rights of visitation or access
that were granted pursuant to this chapter are suspended unless a court determines that it is
in the best interest of the child to continue the grandparent's rights of visitation or access.
A grandparent's rights of visitation or access terminate when the adoption is finalized
pursuant to Title 18‑A, section 9‑308. Nothing in this section prohibits prospective
adoptive parents from independently facilitating or permitting contact between a child and
a grandparent, especially when a court has previously ordered rights of visitation or access.
For the purposes of this subsection, "grandparent" includes a parent of a child's parent
whose parental rights have been terminated, but only until the child is adopted.